Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB798.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 504 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended to read:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 Section 504. Departmental Reports.--(a) The head of each [administrative department and each independent administrative board and commission shall, not later than October first of each even-numbered year, report in writing to the Governor concerning the condition, management, and financial transactions, of the department, board, or commission; such reports shall, except where impracticable, be for the two-year period ending May thirty-first of the year in which they are made. Each departmental administrative board and commission, and each advisory board and commission, shall, not later than September first of each even-numbered year, report in writing to the head of the department of which such board or commission is a part. All such reports shall be attached as exhibits to the report made by the head of the department to the Governor.Except as otherwise in this act specifically provided, the reports required by this section shall be in lieu of all other reports heretofore required by law to be made by the several administrative departments, boards, and commissions, either to the Governor or to the General Assembly.] administrative department, excluding the Office of Attorney General, Department of the Auditor General and Treasury Department, shall annually report in writing to the Governor concerning the condition, management and financial transactions of the administrative department.(b) Reports required under subsection (a) shall:(1) contain a thorough assessment of the weaknesses and risks within each administrative department that could negatively affect the ability of the administrative department to respond to a future emergency in this Commonwealth; and(2) detail the actions necessary to address or otherwise 20250HB0798PN0822 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 resolve the weaknesses and risks within each administrative department.(c) A report required under subsection (a), as well as all documents, materials, information and copies thereof in the possession or control of each department, office, board, commission and council that are included in a report required under subsection (a) shall be privileged and given confidential treatment and shall not be:(1) Subject to discovery or admissible as evidence in any civil action.(2) Considered a public record under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Right-to-Know Law."(3) Made public by the administrative department, except as approved by the Governor in writing.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0798PN0822 - 3 - 123456789101112131415